Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB935.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the PrEP for Pennsylvania Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Health insurance policy." An individual or group health insurance policy, contract or plan that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or licensed health care provider on an expense-incurred service or prepaid basis that is offered by or is governed under any of the following:1234567891011121314151617 (1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) The act of May 18, 1976 (P.L.123, No.54), known as the Individual Accident and Sickness Insurance Minimum Standards Act.(4) A nonprofit corporation subject to 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).The term does not include accident only, fixed indemnity, limited benefit, credit, dental, vision, specified disease, Medicare supplement, Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services supplement, long-term care or disability income, workers' compensation or automobile medical payment insurance."Insurance provider." An entity that issues a health insurance policy."Preexposure prophylaxis HIV medication." A medication that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that can be taken as a prophylaxis to prevent the transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus.Section 3. Mandated coverage.(a) General rule.--A health insurance policy that is delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, extended or modified in this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this section shall provide coverage for the expenses of a preexposure prophylaxis HIV medication.(b) Specialty tier.--An insurance provider may not move a preexposure prophylaxis HIV medication into a specialty tier 20250SB0935PN1059 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 solely for monetary gains.(c) Counseling.--A health insurance policy may not impose counseling from an infectious disease specialist or immunologist in order to receive preexposure prophylaxis HIV medication unless medically necessary.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0935PN1059 - 3 - 1234567